Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2295.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 202-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 202-A. Definitions.--As used in this article--* * *"Recreational place" shall mean a public or private park, playground, playfield, swimming pool, indoor recreation center or gymnasium.* * *"Youth center" shall mean a public or private recreational facility or gymnasium that is intended primarily for use by individuals who are under eighteen years of age and that regularly provides athletic, civic or cultural activities.Section 2. Sections 206-A and 209-A of the act are amended to read:Section 206-A. Licensing of Retailers.--(a) Applicants for retail license or renewal thereof before January 1, 2027, shall meet the following requirements:(1) The premises in which the applicant proposes to conduct business are adequate to protect the revenues.(2) The applicant shall not have failed to disclose any material information required by the department, including information that the applicant has complied with this article by providing a signed statement, under penalty of perjury, of adherence to State presumptive minimum prices or written approval from the department to sell at a specific different 20260HB2295PN3020 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 price.(3) The applicant shall not have any material false statement in the application.(4) The applicant shall not have violated any provision of this article.(5) The applicant shall have filed all required State tax reports and paid any State taxes not subject to a timely perfected administrative or judicial appeal or subject to a duly authorized deferred payment plan.(b) Applicants for retail license or renewal thereof on or after January 1, 2027, shall meet the following requirements:(1) The premises in which the applicant proposes to conduct business:(i) are adequate to protect the revenues;(ii) are not located within five hundred feet of the property line of a public, private or parochial school, day-care center, youth center or recreational place; and(iii) are not located within five hundred feet of the property line of another licensee.(2) The applicant shall not have failed to disclose any material information required by the department, including information that the applicant has complied with this article by providing a signed statement, under penalty of perjury, of adherence to State presumptive minimum prices or written approval from the department to sell at a specific different price.(3) The applicant shall not have any material false statement in the application.(4) The applicant shall not have violated any provision of this article.20260HB2295PN3020 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) The applicant shall have filed all required State tax reports and paid any State taxes not subject to a timely perfected administrative or judicial appeal or subject to a duly authorized deferred payment plan.Section 209-A. Transfer of Licenses.--The department may permit a dealer, under such conditions as the department may impose by regulation, to transfer a license from one location to another or from one cigarette vending machine to another, if the license transfer meets the requirements of section 206-A(b)(1).Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2295PN3020 - 4 - 12345678910